Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4378.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act may be cited as the "Michigan reconnect grant act". (2) The reconnect program and reconnect initiative created respectively in this act and the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723, are intended to provide last-dollar financial assistance to individuals who, subject to sections 15(a) and 21(1)(e)(ii)(A) of the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1715 and 390.1721, are age 25 21 and older seeking and seek associate degrees or industry-recognized certificates or credentials; to provide those individuals with greater access to the education and skills needed to succeed in, and meet the demands of, an evolving economy in which there is continuing demand for a talented local workforce; to drive innovations specific to adult learners in this state's community colleges; to mitigate educational equity gaps in the furtherance of individual prosperity; and to achieve the goal of increasing the number of residents ages 25 to 64 with a college degree or skill certificate or credential to 60% by 2030. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00937'25) or House Bill No. 4377 (request no. H00937'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.